Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4288.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) Subject to section 1 of 1897 PA 205, MCL 35.401, a state agency shall not hire an applicant for unclassified employment unless the state agency bases the hiring on 1 or more objective and merit-based factors that include, but are not limited to, the applicant's relevant education or work experience. (2) As used in this section: (a) "State agency" means an agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or office within a department or agency of the executive branch of this state. (b) "Unclassified employment" means employment that is in the state service and excepted from the classified state civil service under section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 2. A state agency that violates this act is responsible for a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each violation. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. A fine collected must be deposited in the general fund.